Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-806.3 of Title 47, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For the purposes of this section, “automated enforcement
device” means a system operated by a law enforcement agency in this
state that:
1. Is capable of detecting a speeding violation; and


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1434 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Photographs or records an image of the vehicle used in
committing a speeding violation, the operator of the vehicle, or the
license plate of the vehicle.
B. 1. The Department of Public Safety and the Department of
Transportation may place automated enforcement devices at the start
of a construction zone. A sign shall be placed one hundred (100)
feet before the automated enforcement device to warn drivers that
their speed will be monitored and an image may be captured while
entering the construction zone.
2. The automated enforcement device shall only capture an image
and alert a peace officer if a driver is exceeding the speed limit
in a work zone in excess of ten (10) miles per hour of a speed limit
violation.
3. Any image captured but not used as evidence must be deleted
from the automated enforcement device within fifteen (15) minutes.
4. Any image captured that is used as evidence of a speed limit
violation shall be deleted within twenty-four (24) hours of
resolution of the citation.
5. The Department of Public Safety shall not retain, except as
required in this subsection, sell, or transfer any image captured by
an automated enforcement device.
6. The automated enforcement device shall only be used to
capture an image and shall not be used for purposes of
identification or analysis.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1434 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. The automated enforcement device shall be calibrated every
time its position is changed. The results of the calibration shall
be made available to the public.
8. An independent audit of the calibration records and image
retention shall be conducted at least twice a year for each
automated enforcement device. If an audit reveals that images were
retained in violation of this subsection, the vendor of the device
shall be fined One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per image.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 9, 2026 - DO PASS














SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1434 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)